Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.360

Practices may be enjoined.

If, in the judgment of the board any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices which constitute, or will constitute, a violation of this chapter, the board may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining such acts or practices and upon a showing by the board that such person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any such acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order, or such other order as may be appropriate may be granted by such court.

[ 1983 c 234 s 18; 1949 c 226 s 35; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 8269-42.]

NOTES:

Injunctions: Chapter 7.40 RCW.